Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.320

Order forms—Final offering circular and detailed instructions.

Each order form distributed pursuant to RCW 32.32.315 shall be accompanied or preceded by the final offering circular for the subscription offering and a set of detailed instructions explaining how to properly complete the order forms.

[ 1981 c 85 s 63.]